North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 52. Dispositions. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-646 through 7A-657.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

For dispositions under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-900

et seq.

§ 7A-657.1.

Recodified as § 7B-907.

§§ 7A-658 through 7A-663.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.